District of Columbia statutes.
34-1313.19

Review and analysis.

(a)

(1)

By December 31, 2019, the Mayor, the Commission, the OPC, and the electric company shall issue a jointly written report to the Council that:

(A)

Evaluates the effectiveness of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activity and the Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activity in improving the reliability of electric power distribution service and reducing the frequency of electric power outages;

(B)

Evaluates the impact of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activity and the Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activity on tree canopy;

(C)

Evaluates the impact of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges and the Underground Project Charges on the electric company’s residential customers weighing the cost implications of the Underground Project Charge compared to the savings to the customers from improved reliability and the cost reductions from reducing overhead line maintenance and vegetation management;

(D)

Provides recommendations regarding whether the Council should:

(i)

Authorize the issuance, sale, and delivery of Bonds at an amount above the limit set forth in § 34-1312.02(a);

(ii)

Adjust the limit of the electric company’s investment to be recovered through the Underground Project Charges; or

(iii)

Expand the undergrounding of feeders to include all or a portion of the remaining overhead mainline primary and lateral feeders or other alternatives such as to begin full undergrounding of feeders pursuant to amended selection criteria, relative to the primary and secondary selection criteria set forth in § 34-1313.08.

(2)

By December 31, 2027, the Mayor, the Commission, the OPC, and the electric company shall issue a jointly written report to the Council that:

(A)

Evaluates the effectiveness of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activity and the Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activity in improving the reliability of electric power distribution service and reducing the frequency of electric power outages;

(B)

Evaluates the impact of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activity and the Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Activity on tree canopy;

(C)

Evaluates the impact of the DDOT Underground Electric Company Infrastructure Improvement Charges and the Underground Project Charges on the electric company’s residential customers weighing the cost implications of the Underground Project Charge compared to the savings to the customers from improved reliability and the cost reductions from reducing overhead line maintenance and vegetation management;

(D)

Provides recommendations regarding whether the Council should:

(i)

Authorize the issuance, sale, and delivery of additional Bonds;

(ii)

Adjust the limit of the electric company’s investment to be recovered through the Underground Project Charges;

(iii)

Expand the undergrounding of overhead feeders to include the secondary lines pursuant to new primary and secondary selection criteria to be established at that time; or

(iv)

Expand the undergrounding of overhead feeders to include all secondary and service electric power lines and the removal of associated poles.

(3)

The reports required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall include any separate statements of the Mayor, the Commission, the OPC, or the electric company that the Mayor, the Commission, the OPC, or the electric company requests be included in a report.

(b)

The Council shall conduct a public hearing in each quadrant of the District regarding the reports, findings, and recommendations that were filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section within 90 days of the filing of each report.

May 3, 2014, D.C. Law 20-102, § 319, 61 DCR 1882